Utah statutes.
31A-19a-214.   Rating tiers.
(1)  An insurer may file with the commissioner a rate filing that provides for
a program with more than one rate level in the same company or group of
companies if:
(a)  the program is based, to the extent feasible, upon mutually exclusive
underwriting rules per tier;
(b)  the underwriting rules are based on clear, objective criteria that would
lead to a logical distinguishing of potential risk; and
(c)  in filing to establish tiers, the insurer provides supporting information
that evidences a clear distinction between the expected losses and expenses
for each tier.
(2)  A rating tier may not be continued if premium, loss, and expense data
fail to show a continued clear distinction between the tiers.
